Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2739
Production of films, commercials,
and television programs; qualifying business; duties.

A qualifying business which derives its
principal source of income from the production of films, commercials, and
television programs and which is utilizing an economic development program
shall (1) provide notice to the Nebraska Film Office or its successor of each
project for which the qualifying business intends to utilize the economic
development program and (2) acknowledge in the production credits of the film,
commercial, or television program the State of Nebraska and the city operating
the economic development program. The acknowledgment shall be required only
when production credits are displayed and shall not be required if prohibited
by local, state, or federal law, rule, or regulation.

Laws 2012, LB863, § 3.